Louisiana, session 2026, HB253.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:31 and 241 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§31. Individuals, corporations, Corporations and trusts subject to tax
There shall be levied, collected, and paid for each taxable year a tax upon the
net income of residents and nonresidents, estates, trusts, and corporations, as
hereinafter provided.
(1) Resident individuals. Every person residing within the state, or the
personal representative in the event of death, shall pay a tax on net income from
whatever source derived, except as hereinafter exempted.
Every natural person domiciled in the state, and every other natural person
who maintains a permanent place of abode within the state or who spends in the
aggregate more than six months of the taxable year within the state, shall be deemed
to be a resident of this state for the purpose of determining liability for income taxes
under this Chapter.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 253
(2) Nonresident individuals. Every nonresident shall pay a tax upon such net
income as is derived from property located, or from services rendered, or from
business transacted within the state, or from sources within the state, except as
hereinafter exempted.
(3) Corporations. Corporations shall be taxed on net income from sources
within the state, as hereinafter set out.
(4) (2) Domestic real estate investment trusts. Trusts shall be taxed on net
income from whatever source derived, except as otherwise exempted.
(5) (3) Foreign real estate investment trusts. Foreign real estate investment
trusts shall be taxed on net income from sources within the state, as hereinafter set
out.
(6) (4) For state income tax purposes, capital construction funds, created in
accordance with 46 U.S.C. App. 1177 and 26 U.S.C. 7518, and all related items of
income, gain, deduction, loss, credit, adjustment, and basis shall be taxed in the same
manner as those items are taxed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 7518 and applicable federal
regulations.
* * *
SUBPART F. NONRESIDENT INDIVIDUALS
AND CORPORATIONS
§241. Net income subject to tax
The net income of a nonresident individual or a corporation subject to the tax
imposed by this Chapter shall be the sum of the net allocable income earned within
or derived from sources within this state, as defined in R.S. 47:243, and the net
apportionable income derived from sources in this state, as defined in R.S. 47:244.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 47:32(A), 295(A), 300.1, and 300.2 are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall apply to taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-286 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 253
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.